Utah statutes.
38-13-103.   Scope of chapter.
(1)  This chapter may not be interpreted to impair or affect the right of any
person to whom a debt may be due for any work performed or materials furnished
to maintain a personal action to recover the same.
(2)  This chapter supersedes Sections 38-2-3 and 38-2-4 as it relates to a
lien for a repairman making, altering, repairing, or performing labor on an
aircraft.
